Washington statutes.
RCW 36.28.100

Employment of prisoners.

The sheriff or director of public safety shall employ all able bodied persons sentenced to imprisonment in the county jail in such manner and at such places within the county as may be directed by the legislative authority of the county.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 54; 1963 c 4 s 36.28.100. Prior: 1909 c 249 s 27; RRS s 2279.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 154: See note following RCW 2.12.030.